Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1768.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Keystone Fresh Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Schools across Pennsylvania serve more than 168 million lunches per year, providing critical nutrients to children across this Commonwealth. Due to the large volume of food purchased to support nutrition programs, schools have <--1234567891011121314151617 the potential to be one of the largest markets for agricultural producers across this Commonwealth. Farm to School programs encourage schools to purchase, promote and serve local foods. Nationally, Farm to School programs have shown to be an innovative strategy to improve child nutrition, with research indicating students eat 37% more vegetables and 11% more fruit. Pennsylvania has a long history of interest in Farm to School programs, with 268 districts (44%) currently participating in some level of farm-to-school activity. According to the United States Department of Agriculture's 2023 Farm to School Census, more than 71% of Pennsylvania's schools reported purchasing some Pennsylvania products, yet those local food sales, excluding liquid milk, were only 9% of their total lunch program budget.(2) The purpose of this program is to meet Statewide interest in increasing the amount of local food served in school meals by helping to change school food procurement practices, provide technical assistance and training for how to integrate local foods in school meals and help Pennsylvania producers access the school food market.(3) Enacting the Keystone Fresh Act will provide State-level investment to expand farm-to-school efforts and provide economic, public health and community benefits for Pennsylvanians.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the 20250HB1768PN2596 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth."Eligible costs." The actual, documented costs of local food, which are reimbursable with program grant funds as provided under sections 5, 6, 7 and 8."Eligible school district." A kindergarten through grade 12 school district or school in this Commonwealth with at least 100 students participating in the National School Lunch Program."Fund." The Keystone Fresh Fund established under section 9."Ineligible costs." Any costs that do not constitute eligible costs for the purposes of the program, including, but not limited to, any costs incurred by a school or school district in the sourcing or purchasing of fluid dairy milk or in association with the school or school district's ordinary, unexpanded sourcing and procurement of local food products at or below the baseline levels identified in the school or school district's grant application submitted under section 5."Local food." Any fruits, vegetables, grains, meats, fish, beans, yogurt and cheese that are grown, harvested or raised and minimally processed products in this Commonwealth."Minimally processed products." Food products processed in a manner that does not fundamentally alter the product and where the product retains its inherent character and the primary item can still be identified. The term includes, but is not limited to, freezing, pasteurizing milk for use in yogurt or cheese, butchering livestock and poultry, cleaning fish, dicing and slicing produce, forming ground food products into patties, grinding meats, grinding grains, drying grains or beans or dehydrating food products and washing and cutting produce. Fully cooked or canned items are not considered minimally processed products.20250HB1768PN2596 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "National School Lunch Program." The federally funded school lunch meal program operating in this Commonwealth's public and nonprofit private schools."New and beginning farmer or rancher." A farmer or rancher who has operated a farm or ranch for 10 years or less either as a sole operator or with others who have operated a farm or ranch for 10 years or less."Program." The Keystone Fresh Program established under section 4."School food authority." The governing body responsible for the administration of one or more schools that has the legal authority to operate the National School Lunch Program."Socially disadvantaged group." A population group whose members have been subjected to prejudice or discrimination on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, disability or, where applicable, sex, marital status, familial status, parental status, religion, sexual orientation, genetic information, political beliefs or participation in any public assistance program, because of their membership in the group or the shared characteristics of the group and without regard to their individual qualities."Sustainable agriculture techniques." Agriculture practices that include no-till and/or use of a cover crop system, certified organic, regenerative organic practices, pastured poultry or grass-fed meat."Veteran farmer or rancher."(1) A producer who served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable.20250HB1768PN2596 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A legal entity or joint operation can be a veteran farmer or rancher only if all individual members independently qualify.Section 4. Establishment.The Keystone Fresh Program is established within the department in consultation with the Department of Agriculture.Section 5. Fresh Schools Grant Program.(a) Authorization.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall establish the Fresh Schools Grant Program to award grants for the purpose of reimbursing school food authorities for the purchase of local food to be used in school meals.(b) Eligibility.--An eligible school district may submit an application to the department for grant funding.(c) Evaluation of applicants.--The department shall develop an application and evaluate applicants based on the readiness level of a school food authority to purchase and serve local food in school meals by considering:(1) The applicant's local foods purchasing plan in the grant application.(2) The applicant's ability to demonstrate a commitment to local purchasing of food and agricultural education.(3) The applicant's access to a kitchen with the ability to store, prepare and serve local food products.(4) That preference shall be given to applicants sourcing from veteran farmers or ranchers, farmers or ranchers who are from socially disadvantaged groups, new and beginning farmers or ranchers or farmers or ranchers that use sustainable agriculture techniques.(d) Grant amounts.--The department shall award grants based 20250HB1768PN2596 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on student enrollment, as identified by the applicant in the following amounts on an annual basis:(1) Applicants with a student enrollment from 100 to 1,000 are eligible for an award from $16,500 to $45,000.(2) Applicants with a student enrollment from 1,001 to 5,000 are eligible for an award from $35,000 to $120,000.(3) Applicants with a student enrollment from 5,001 to 10,000 are eligible for an award from $85,000 to $200,000.(4) Applicants with a student enrollment from 10,001 to 32,000 are eligible for an award from $100,000 to $275,000.(5) Applicants with a student enrollment above 32,000 are eligible for an award from $200,000 to $650,000.(e) Eligible use of grants.--A school district may use grant awards for the following purposes:(1) To purchase whole and minimally processed fruits, vegetables, herbs, meat, seafood, yogurt, cheese, legumes and grains that are 100% grown, raised or caught and processed in this Commonwealth.(2) To purchase products that are 100% Pennsylvania grown but processed in a neighboring state.(3) No more than 20% of the total amounts awarded to the school district may be used to support equipment upgrades, materials, training and staff time directly related to supporting the increased amount of local Pennsylvania products served in school meals.(4) Grant awards may only be used for school lunch, breakfast or Seamless Summer Option program meals in school settings.(f) Ineligible use of grant awards.--School districts may not use grant awards to purchase fluid dairy milk for the 20250HB1768PN2596 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes of this program or any other ineligible costs.(g) Reimbursement of eligible costs.--The department shall reimburse school food authorities for eligible costs on an annual basis with the following conditions:(1) School food authorities shall submit invoices on a timeline set by the department in order to be reimbursed for their eligible costs under this section.(2) The department may allow the school food authority to apply for an extension to spend down unused money in the following year.(h) Reporting on use of grant awards.--The department shall monitor the Fresh Schools Grant Program to ensure program integrity. Grantees shall be required to include the following information to request reimbursement:(1) Products purchased.(2) The name, location and total amount spent per farm, either through receipts or uploading procurement details.Section 6. Keystone Producer Grant Program and Keystone Assistance Grant Program.(a) Authorization.--The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the department, shall establish the following grant programs:(1) The Keystone Producer Grant Program to award grants for the purposes of providing funding to participating farms, food hubs and local food aggregators for equipment and marketing needed to participate in the program. Eligible entities shall include individual farms, food hubs and local food aggregators participating in the program.(2) The Keystone Assistance Grant Program to award technical assistance grants to assist school food authorities 20250HB1768PN2596 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with incorporating additional minimally processed products into their lunch programs, including scratch cooking. Eligible entities shall include nonprofits and institutions of higher education located in this Commonwealth participating in the program.(b) Eligible use of money.--The Department of Agriculture shall allow grant awards outlined in this section for the following purposes:(1) Keystone Producer Grant Program awards may be used for equipment or marketing needed by producers to meet the school food institutional standards.(2) Keystone Assistance Grant Program awards may be used by awardees to assist school food authorities to incorporate additional minimally processed products into their lunch programs, including scratch cooking.(c) Grant awards.--The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the department, shall develop an application and process for awarding grants outlined in this section that includes the following requirements and considerations:(1) Preference shall be given to applicants sourcing from or working with veteran farmers or ranchers, farmers or ranchers who are from socially disadvantaged groups, new and beginning farmers or ranchers or farmers or ranchers that use sustainable agriculture techniques.(2) Grantees shall be eligible to apply for one of the grants outlined in this section per grant cycle.(d) Grant amounts.--Subject to the availability of money under section 9, the Department of Agriculture shall determine the amount of each grant in this section with the maximum award amount not to exceed $150,000 per grantee.20250HB1768PN2596 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Administration.(a) Department administration.--For the purposes of carrying out this act and subject to the availability of money under section 9, the department shall receive necessary money from the fund to cover administrative costs incurred in establishing the program and commencing initial program operations under this act, including, but not limited to, the costs associated with:(1) Hiring and employing of at least one full-time staff person and other personnel necessary for the administration and management of the programs established in this act and providing relevant program-related information and assistance to eligible school districts.(2) Developing requests for proposals, reviewing applications and administering disbursements to grant recipients.(3) Acquiring, maintaining and repairing relevant technology, equipment and computer programs needed to establish, implement and successfully operate this act and facilitate the annual pro rata allocation, awarding and periodic disbursement of program grant funding available.(4) Monitoring and developing reports related to the Fresh Schools Grant Program, including, but not limited to, program implementation and operations, program funding and program-related activities and outcomes.(b) Department of Agriculture administration.--For the purposes of carrying out this act and subject to the availability of money under section 9, the Department of Agriculture shall receive necessary money from the fund to cover administrative costs incurred in establishing the program and commencing initial program operations under this act, including, 20250HB1768PN2596 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 but not limited to, the costs associated with:(1) Hiring and employing at least one full-time staff person and other personnel as may be necessary to administer and manage the grants in section 6 and provide relevant program-related information to producers, farmers and entities providing technical assistance.(2) Developing requests for proposals, reviewing applications and administering disbursements to grant recipients.(3) Conducting outreach and providing appropriate training to farmers who are engaged or who plan to engage in the sale or donation of local food products to schools and school districts for program purposes.(4) Developing a farm-to-school Internet website that includes, at a minimum, the following information:(i) A list of farms that have served an eligible school district.(ii) Materials listed below, divided into sections:(A) School meal operators. The following information shall be included:(I) Buying local foods.(II) Preparing local foods.(III) Promoting local school meals.(B) Agricultural producers. The following information shall be included:(I) Understanding school market channels.(II) Best practices for selling to eligible school districts.(III) Promoting local foods to eligible school districts.20250HB1768PN2596 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) School and community members. The following information shall be included:(I) Insights into school meal programs.(II) Engaging with school meal programs.(D) Sample menus incorporating local products.(E) Recipes using local products.(F) Marketing materials for local food in cafeterias.(5) Monitoring and developing reports related to the grants established in section 6, including, but not limited to, program implementation and operations, program funding and program-related activities and outcomes.Section 8. External evaluations.(a) External review.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall biennially contract with an eligible entity to conduct an external review to evaluate the efficacy of the components of this act.(b) Reviewers.--Eligible entities to conduct external reviews shall include nonprofit organizations and academic institutions as determined by the department.(c) Report.--External evaluations shall include, at a minimum:(1) Outcomes of the overall grant program, including the dollar amount spent on local products, the purchasing impact on various agricultural sectors as determined by the Department of Agriculture and changes in values-based purchasing behavior.(2) Guidance to the department and the Department of Agriculture on areas of success and areas in need of improvement to increase local food procurement.20250HB1768PN2596 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A report to be transmitted to the members of the General Assembly and made available to the public on a publicly accessible Internet website.Section 9. Establishment of Keystone Fresh Fund.(a) Fund established.--The Keystone Fresh Fund is established as an interest-bearing restricted revenue account, into which shall be deposited money as it is appropriated, given, granted or donated to the Fresh Schools Grant Program, the Keystone Producer Grant Program and the Keystone Assistance Grant Program, by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or any other governmental or private agency or person.(b) Use of fund.--Money deposited into the fund and interest earned on the money deposited into the fund shall be used solely for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this act, with the following requirements:(1) No less than 60% of money deposited into the fund shall be appropriated for the grants established in section 5.(2) No less than 25% of money deposited into the fund shall be appropriated to cover the costs incurred by the department and the Department of Agriculture in carrying out the provisions of sections 6 and 7.(3) No less than $250,000 of money deposited into the fund shall be reserved every two years for the purpose of carrying out the biennial external evaluations provided for in section 8.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Sections 5, 6 and 8 shall take effect in 245 days.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.20250HB1768PN2596 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 180 days.ESTABLISHING THE LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM, THE KEYSTONE PRODUCER GRANT PROGRAM, THE KEYSTONE ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM AND THE KEYSTONE FRESH FARM TO SCHOOL ACCOUNT; AND IMPOSING DUTIES ON THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE.THIS ACT SHALL BE KNOWN AND MAY BE CITED AS THE KEYSTONE FRESH FARM TO SCHOOL NUTRITION ACT.SECTION 2. FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) SCHOOLS ACROSS PENNSYLVANIA SERVE MORE THAN 168,000,000 LUNCHES PER YEAR, PROVIDING CRITICAL NUTRIENTS TO CHILDREN ACROSS THIS COMMONWEALTH. DUE TO THE LARGE VOLUME OF FOOD PURCHASED TO SUPPORT NUTRITION PROGRAMS, SCHOOLS HAVE THE POTENTIAL TO BE ONE OF THE LARGEST MARKETS FOR AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS ACROSS THIS COMMONWEALTH. FARM TO SCHOOL PROGRAMS ENCOURAGE SCHOOLS TO PURCHASE, PROMOTE AND SERVE LOCAL FOODS.(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO MEET STATEWIDE INTEREST IN INCREASING THE AMOUNT OF LOCAL FOOD SERVED IN SCHOOL MEALS BY HELPING TO CHANGE SCHOOL FOOD PROCUREMENT PRACTICES, PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND TRAINING FOR HOW TO INTEGRATE LOCAL FOODS IN SCHOOL MEALS AND HELP PENNSYLVANIA PRODUCERS ACCESS THE SCHOOL FOOD MARKET.(3) ENACTING THE KEYSTONE FRESH FARM TO SCHOOL NUTRITION ACT WILL PROVIDE STATE-LEVEL INVESTMENT TO EXPAND FARM-TO-SCHOOL EFFORTS AND PROVIDE ECONOMIC, PUBLIC HEALTH AND 20250HB1768PN2596 - 13 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 COMMUNITY BENEFITS FOR PENNSYLVANIANS.SECTION 3. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ACCOUNT." THE KEYSTONE FRESH FARM TO SCHOOL ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 8(A)."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."LOCAL FOOD." FRUITS, HERBS, VEGETABLES, GRAINS, MEATS, FISH, BEANS, YOGURT AND CHEESE THAT ARE GROWN, HARVESTED OR RAISED AND MINIMALLY PROCESSED PRODUCTS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH."MINIMALLY PROCESSED PRODUCTS."(1) A FOOD PRODUCT PROCESSED IN A MANNER THAT DOES NOT FUNDAMENTALLY ALTER THE PRODUCT AND THAT RETAINS ITS INHERENT CHARACTER SO THAT THE PRIMARY PRODUCT CAN STILL BE IDENTIFIED.(2) THE PROCESS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) INCLUDES FREEZING, PASTEURIZING MILK FOR USE IN YOGURT OR CHEESE, BUTCHERING LIVESTOCK AND POULTRY, CLEANING FISH, FORMING GROUND FOOD PRODUCTS INTO PATTIES, GRINDING MEATS, GRINDING GRAINS, DRYING GRAINS OR BEANS, DEHYDRATING FOOD PRODUCTS AND WASHING AND CUTTING PRODUCE.(3) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT, FULLY COOKED ITEMS ARE NOT CONSIDERED MINIMALLY PROCESSED PRODUCTS."NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM." AS DEFINED IN 7 CFR 210.2 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS)."NEW AND BEGINNING FARMER OR RANCHER."(1) A FARMER OR RANCHER WHO HAS OPERATED A FARM OR RANCH FOR LESS THAN 10 YEARS.20250HB1768PN2596 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE TERM INCLUDES A LEGAL ENTITY OR JOINT OPERATION ONLY IF ALL INDIVIDUAL OWNERS THEREOF HAVE OPERATED FARMS OR RANCHES FOR 10 YEARS OR MORE."PROGRAM." THE LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 4(A)."SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY." THE GOVERNING BODY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF ONE OR MORE SCHOOLS THAT HAS THE LEGAL AUTHORITY TO OPERATE THE NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM."SEAMLESS SUMMER OPTION." A FEDERAL PROGRAM THAT ALLOWS SCHOOL DISTRICTS TO OPERATE A MODIFIED VERSION OF THE NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM UNDER THE NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH ACT (60 STAT. 230, 42 U.S.C. § 1751) TO PROVIDE SUMMER MEALS FOR CHILDREN."VETERAN FARMER OR RANCHER."(1) A PRODUCER WHO SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES, INCLUDING A RESERVE COMPONENT OR THE NATIONAL GUARD, AND WHO WAS DISCHARGED OR RELEASED FROM SERVICE UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE.(2) A LEGAL ENTITY OR JOINT OPERATION CAN BE A VETERAN FARMER OR RANCHER ONLY IF ALL INDIVIDUAL MEMBERS INDEPENDENTLY QUALIFY.SECTION 4. LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--NOT LATER THAN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM.(B) PURPOSE.--THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS TO SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES FOR THE PURCHASE OF LOCAL FOOD TO BE USED IN SCHOOL MEALS.(C) ADMINISTRATION.--THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER 20250HB1768PN2596 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE DEVELOPMENT OF A PROCESS TO REVIEW AND APPROVE GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM.(D) APPLICATION GENERALLY.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:(1) DEVELOP A FORM FOR SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES TO SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE SCHOOL'S LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING PLAN.(2) PRESCRIBE THE MANNER IN WHICH A COMPLETED APPLICATION FORM MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT.(3) POST THE APPLICATION FORM ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT.(E) ELIGIBILITY.--A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A GRANT FOR A SCHOOL, INCLUDING A PUBLIC SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL AND PRIVATE SCHOOL, THAT OPERATES THE NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM AND HAS AT LEAST 100 ENROLLED STUDENTS IN A BUILDING AT THE SCHOOL.(F) APPLICATION REVIEW.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATION OF EACH SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY.(2) IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO APPROVE AN APPLICATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:(I) EVALUATE THE READINESS LEVEL OF THE SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY TO PURCHASE AND SERVE LOCAL FOOD IN SCHOOL MEALS BY CONSIDERING:(A) THE APPLICANT'S LOCAL FOOD PURCHASING PLAN.(B) THE APPLICANT'S ABILITY TO DEMONSTRATE A COMMITMENT TO PURCHASING LOCAL FOOD SUPPLEMENTED WITH AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION.(C) THE APPLICANT'S ACCESS TO A KITCHEN WITH THE ABILITY TO STORE, PREPARE AND SERVE LOCAL FOOD PRODUCTS.20250HB1768PN2596 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) GIVE PREFERENCE TO APPLICANTS SOURCING FROM VETERAN FARMERS OR RANCHERS OR NEW AND BEGINNING FARMERS OR RANCHERS.(III) GIVE PREFERENCE TO APPLICANTS WHO MEET THE COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION UNDER THE HEALTHY, HUNGER-FREE KIDS ACT OF 2010 (PUBLIC LAW 111-296, 124 STAT. 3183).(G) GRANT AMOUNTS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL, TO THE EXTENT THAT MONEY IS AVAILABLE, AWARD A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM TO A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY BASED ON STUDENT ENROLLMENT, AS IDENTIFIED IN THE APPLICATION OF THE SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY, IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ON AN ANNUAL BASIS:(1) AN APPLICANT WITH A STUDENT ENROLLMENT FROM 100 TO 1,000 IS ELIGIBLE FOR AN AWARD FROM $16,500 TO $45,000.(2) AN APPLICANT WITH A STUDENT ENROLLMENT FROM 1,001 TO 5,000 IS ELIGIBLE FOR AN AWARD FROM $35,000 TO $120,000.(3) AN APPLICANT WITH A STUDENT ENROLLMENT FROM 5,001 TO 10,000 IS ELIGIBLE FOR AN AWARD FROM $85,000 TO $200,000.(4) AN APPLICANT WITH A STUDENT ENROLLMENT FROM 10,001 TO 32,000 IS ELIGIBLE FOR AN AWARD FROM $100,000 TO $275,000.(5) AN APPLICANT WITH A STUDENT ENROLLMENT EXCEEDING 32,000 IS ELIGIBLE FOR AN AWARD FROM $200,000 TO $650,000.(H) EXTENSION.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALLOW A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY TO APPLY FOR AN EXTENSION TO SPEND UNUSED FUNDS IN THE FOLLOWING SCHOOL YEAR.(I) ELIGIBLE USE OF GRANTS.--A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY MAY USE A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:(1) TO PURCHASE LOCAL FOOD.(2) TO PURCHASE LOCAL FOOD THAT HAS BEEN PROCESSED IN A NEIGHBORING STATE INTO MINIMALLY PROCESSED PRODUCTS.20250HB1768PN2596 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) RESTRICTIONS.--(1) NO MORE THAN 20% OF THE TOTAL AMOUNTS AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM TO A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY MAY BE USED TO SUPPORT EQUIPMENT UPGRADES, MATERIALS, TRAINING AND STAFF TIME DIRECTLY RELATED TO SUPPORTING THE INCREASED AMOUNT OF LOCAL FOOD SERVED IN SCHOOL MEALS.(2) A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY ONLY BE USED FOR SCHOOL LUNCH, BREAKFAST OR SEAMLESS SUMMER OPTION PROGRAM MEALS IN SCHOOL SETTINGS AND PURCHASED IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL, STATE AND LOCAL PROCUREMENT REQUIREMENTS.(K) INELIGIBLE USE OF GRANT.--A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY MAY NOT USE A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM FOR COSTS THAT DO NOT CONSTITUTE ELIGIBLE COSTS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING COSTS INCURRED BY A SCHOOL OR SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY IN THE SOURCING OR PURCHASING OF FLUID DAIRY MILK OR IN ASSOCIATION WITH THE SCHOOL OR SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY'S ORDINARY, UNEXPANDED SOURCING AND PROCUREMENT OF LOCAL FOOD PRODUCTS AT OR BELOW THE BASELINE LEVELS IDENTIFIED IN THE SCHOOL OR SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY'S GRANT APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION.(L) REPORTING ON USE OF GRANT.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MONITOR THE PROGRAM TO ENSURE PROGRAM INTEGRITY.(2) A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY THAT RECEIVES A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO THE DEPARTMENT:(I) AN ITEMIZATION OF LOCAL FOOD PURCHASED, INCLUDING QUANTITY AND ITEMIZED DOLLAR AMOUNT.(II) THE NAME, LOCATION AND TOTAL AMOUNT SPENT PER FARM, FOOD HUB OR LOCAL FOOD AGGREGATOR.(III) OTHER INFORMATION DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE 20250HB1768PN2596 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEPARTMENT TO VALIDATE THE PURCHASE OF LOCAL FOOD.SECTION 5. KEYSTONE PRODUCER GRANT PROGRAM AND KEYSTONE ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--NOT LATER THAN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL ESTABLISH THE KEYSTONE PRODUCER GRANT PROGRAM AND THE KEYSTONE ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM.(B) ADMINISTRATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE SHALL WORK IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE KEYSTONE PRODUCER GRANT PROGRAM AND THE KEYSTONE ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE PROCESS TO REVIEW AND APPROVE GRANTS UNDER THIS SECTION.(C) PURPOSES.--(1) THE PURPOSE OF THE KEYSTONE PRODUCER GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS FOR THE PURPOSES OF PROVIDING FUNDING TO PARTICIPATING FARMS, FOOD HUBS AND LOCAL FOOD AGGREGATORS FOR EQUIPMENT AND MARKETING NEEDED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM. ELIGIBLE ENTITIES INCLUDE INDIVIDUAL PRODUCERS, FOOD HUBS AND LOCAL FOOD AGGREGATORS PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM.(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE KEYSTONE ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE OR SMALL EQUIPMENT GRANTS TO ASSIST SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES WHO RECEIVE A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM WITH PROCURING LOCAL FOOD OR INCORPORATING ADDITIONAL MINIMALLY PROCESSED PRODUCTS INTO THEIR LUNCH PROGRAMS, INCLUDING SCRATCH COOKING. ELIGIBLE ENTITIES INCLUDE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS AND INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND ABLE TO DEMONSTRATE THEIR PARTNERSHIP WITH THE SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES THAT THEY INTEND TO ASSIST.20250HB1768PN2596 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) GRANTS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL:(1) DEVELOP A FORM TO APPLY FOR A GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION.(2) PRESCRIBE THE MANNER IN WHICH A COMPLETED APPLICATION FORM MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.(3) POST THE APPLICATION FORM ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.(E) APPLICATION REVIEW.--THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATION OF EACH APPLICANT AND, IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO APPROVE THE APPLICATION, SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO APPLICANTS SOURCING FROM OR WORKING WITH VETERAN FARMERS OR RANCHERS OR NEW AND BEGINNING FARMERS OR RANCHERS.(F) ELIGIBILITY.--AN APPLICANT SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO APPLY FOR ONE OF THE GRANTS OUTLINED IN THIS SECTION PER GRANT CYCLE.(G) GRANT AMOUNTS.--SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MONEY, THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE SHALL DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT IN THIS SECTION, WITH THE MAXIMUM AWARD AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED $150,000 PER GRANTEE.SECTION 6. ADMINISTRATION.(A) ADMINISTRATION BY DEPARTMENT.--FOR THE PURPOSES OF CARRYING OUT THIS ACT AND SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MONEY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE UP TO 3.5% OF APPROPRIATED MONEY THAT IT RECEIVES TO COVER ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS INCURRED IN ESTABLISHING THE PROGRAM AND COMMENCING INITIAL PROGRAM OPERATIONS UNDER THIS ACT, INCLUDING THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH:(1) HIRING AND EMPLOYING AT LEAST ONE FULL-TIME STAFF PERSON AND OTHER PERSONNEL NECESSARY FOR THE ADMINISTRATION AND MANAGEMENT OF THE PROGRAM AND PROVIDING RELEVANT PROGRAM-20250HB1768PN2596 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RELATED INFORMATION AND ASSISTANCE TO SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES.(2) DEVELOPING REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS, REVIEWING APPLICATIONS AND ADMINISTERING DISBURSEMENTS TO GRANT RECIPIENTS.(3) ACQUIRING, MAINTAINING AND REPAIRING RELEVANT TECHNOLOGY, EQUIPMENT AND COMPUTER PROGRAMS NEEDED TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THIS ACT AND FACILITATE THE ANNUAL PRO RATA ALLOCATION, AWARDING AND PERIODIC DISBURSEMENT OF PROGRAM GRANT FUNDING AVAILABLE.(4) MONITORING AND DEVELOPING REPORTS RELATED TO THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION AND OPERATIONS, PROGRAM FUNDING AND PROGRAM-RELATED ACTIVITIES AND OUTCOMES.(B) ADMINISTRATION BY DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.--FOR THE PURPOSES OF CARRYING OUT THIS ACT AND SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MONEY, THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE MAY USE UP TO 3.5% OF APPROPRIATED MONEY THAT IT RECEIVES TO COVER ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS INCURRED IN ESTABLISHING THE PROGRAMS UNDER SECTION 5 AND COMMENCING THEIR INITIAL OPERATIONS UNDER THIS ACT, INCLUDING THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH:(1) HIRING AND EMPLOYING AT LEAST ONE FULL-TIME STAFF PERSON AND OTHER PERSONNEL NECESSARY FOR THE ADMINISTRATION AND MANAGEMENT OF THE PROGRAMS UNDER SECTION 5 AND PROVIDE RELEVANT PROGRAM-RELATED INFORMATION TO PRODUCERS, FARMERS AND ENTITIES PROVIDING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.(2) DEVELOPING REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS, REVIEWING APPLICATIONS AND ADMINISTERING DISBURSEMENTS TO GRANT RECIPIENTS.(3) CONDUCTING OUTREACH AND PROVIDING APPROPRIATE TRAINING TO FARMERS WHO ARE ENGAGED OR WHO PLAN TO ENGAGE IN 20250HB1768PN2596 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE SALE OR DONATION OF LOCAL FOOD PRODUCTS TO SCHOOLS AND SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES.(4) MONITORING AND DEVELOPING REPORTS RELATED TO THE PROGRAMS UNDER SECTION 5, INCLUDING IMPLEMENTATION AND OPERATIONS, FUNDING AND RELATED ACTIVITIES AND OUTCOMES.(C) INTERNET WEBSITE.--THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, SHALL DEVELOP A FARM-TO-SCHOOL INTERNET WEBSITE THAT INCLUDES, AT A MINIMUM, THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(1) A LIST OF FARMS THAT HAVE SERVED A SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITY.(2) THE FOLLOWING MATERIALS, DIVIDED INTO SECTIONS:(I) SCHOOL MEAL OPERATORS, WHICH MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(A) BUYING LOCAL FOODS.(B) PREPARING LOCAL FOODS.(C) PROMOTING LOCAL SCHOOL MEALS USING LOCAL FOOD.(II) AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS, WHICH MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(A) UNDERSTANDING SCHOOL MARKET CHANNELS.(B) BEST PRACTICES FOR SELLING TO SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES.(C) PROMOTING LOCAL FOODS TO SCHOOL FOOD AUTHORITIES.(III) SCHOOL AND COMMUNITY MEMBERS, WHICH MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(A) INSIGHTS INTO SCHOOL MEAL PROGRAMS.(B) ENGAGING WITH SCHOOL MEAL PROGRAMS.(IV) SAMPLE MENUS INCORPORATING LOCAL PRODUCTS.20250HB1768PN2596 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (V) RECIPES USING LOCAL PRODUCTS.(VI) MARKETING MATERIALS FOR LOCAL FOOD IN CAFETERIAS.SECTION 7. EXTERNAL EVALUATIONS.(A) EXTERNAL REVIEW.--THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, SHALL:(1) DETERMINE QUALIFIED ENTITIES, INCLUDING NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS AND ACADEMIC INSTITUTIONS, THAT CAN CONDUCT, ON A BIENNIAL BASIS, AN EXTERNAL REVIEW TO EVALUATE THE EFFICACY OF THE COMPONENTS OF THIS ACT.(2) CONTRACT WITH A QUALIFIED ENTITY FOR THE PURPOSE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1).(B) CONTENTS.--EACH BIENNIAL EXTERNAL EVALUATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:(1) OUTCOMES OF THE OVERALL GRANT PROGRAMS UNDER THIS ACT, INCLUDING THE DOLLAR AMOUNT SPENT ON LOCAL FOOD, THE PURCHASING IMPACT ON VARIOUS AGRICULTURAL SECTORS AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND CHANGES IN VALUES-BASED PURCHASING BEHAVIOR.(2) GUIDANCE TO THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE ON AREAS OF SUCCESS AND AREAS IN NEED OF IMPROVEMENT TO INCREASE LOCAL FOOD PROCUREMENT.(C) REPORTS.--(1) NOT LATER THAT TWO YEARS AFTER THE PROGRAMS UNDER SECTIONS 4 AND 5 ARE ESTABLISHED, AND EVERY TWO YEARS THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, SHALL ISSUE A REPORT BASED ON THE BIENNIAL EXTERNAL EVALUATION UNDER THIS SECTION.(2) EACH REPORT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE TRANSMITTED TO:20250HB1768PN2596 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE AGRICULTURE AND RURAL AFFAIRS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(II) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE AGRICULTURE AND RURAL AFFAIRS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(III) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(IV) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(3) EACH REPORT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE POSTED ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITES OF THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.SECTION 8. KEYSTONE FRESH FARM TO SCHOOL ACCOUNT.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--THE KEYSTONE FRESH FARM TO SCHOOL ACCOUNT IS ESTABLISHED AS A RESTRICTED REVENUE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE GENERAL FUND. MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT, INCLUDING INTEREST EARNED ON THE MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT, IS APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE ON A CONTINUING BASIS TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT.(B) DEPOSITS.--MONEY APPROPRIATED, GIVEN, GRANTED OR DONATED TO THE PROGRAMS OR ACTIVITIES SPECIFIED UNDER THIS ACT BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE COMMONWEALTH OR ANY OTHER GOVERNMENTAL OR PRIVATE AGENCY OR PERSON SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE ACCOUNT.(C) USE OF MONEY.--EVERY TWO YEARS, $250,000 OF THE MONEY DEPOSITED INTO THE ACCOUNT SHALL BE RESERVED FOR THE PURPOSES OF CARRYING OUT THE BIENNIAL EXTERNAL EVALUATIONS UNDER SECTION 7.SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE.THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE FOLLOWING SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY:SECTION 4.20250HB1768PN2596 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 5.THIS SECTION.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 180 DAYS.20250HB1768PN2596 - 25 - 1234